Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. Driver’s License.
§ 63-1-35.
Form of license; use of Social Security Number of licensee; photograph of licensee; renewal of license by electronic means; registered sex offender’s license to identify licensee as sex offender; designation as veteran on license upon request of honorably discharged veteran.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article which shall, among other features, include a driver’s license number assigned by the Department of Public Safety. A licensee shall list his social security number with the department which shall cross reference the social security number with the driver’s license number for purposes of identification. Additionally, each license shall bear a full-face color photograph of the licensee in such form that the license and the photograph cannot be separated. The photograph shall be taken so that one (1) exposure will photograph the applicant and the application simultaneously on the same film. The department shall use a process in the issuance of a license with a color photograph that shall prevent as nearly as possible any alteration, counterfeiting, duplication, reproduction, forging or modification of the license or the superimposition of a photograph without ready detection. The photograph shall be replaced by the department at the time of renewal. Drivers’ licenses, including photographs appearing thereon, may be renewed by electronic means according to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner in conformity to Section 27-104-33.

The commissioner shall prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article to licensees who are not United States citizens and who do not possess a social security number issued by the United States government. The license of such persons shall include a number and/or other identifying features.

Any new, renewal or duplicate driver’s license, temporary driving permit, intermediate license or commercial driver’s license issued to a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 45-33-25 shall bear a designation identifying the licensee or permittee as a sex offender.

The commissioner is authorized to provide the new, renewal or duplicate driver’s license, temporary driving permit, intermediate license or commercial driver’s license to any honorably discharged veteran as defined in Title 38 of the United States Code, and such license or permit shall exhibit the letters “Vet” or any other mark identifying the person as a veteran. The veteran requesting the “Vet” designation shall present his DD-214 or equivalent document that includes a notation from the state Veterans Affairs Board that the applicant is a veteran.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8103; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1968, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 13; Laws, 1996, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 535, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 16; Laws, 2011, ch. 467, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 561, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 2012.).

§ 63-1-37.
Issuance of duplicate license.

If a license or regular learner’s permit issued under the provisions of this article is lost or destroyed, the licensee may obtain a duplicate copy by paying the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43. The license or permit shall be marked “Duplicate.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8104; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 349; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 14 eff from and after July 1, 1985; Laws, 2001, ch. 535, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 467, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 11, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-39.
Signatures on license.

No license issued pursuant to this article shall be valid under the provisions of this article until it has been signed by the applicant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8101; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 15; Laws, 2015, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2015).

§ 63-1-41.
Possession and display of license upon demand.

Every licensee shall have the required license in his immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall display the same, upon demand of a justice court judge, a peace officer or license examiner or other authorized employee of the commissioner. However, no person charged with violating this section shall be convicted if he produces in court a license theretofore issued to him and valid at the time of his arrest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8108; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 63-1-43.
Fees for licenses generally.

The commissioner shall charge and collect the following fees:

Fees to which the card stock fee authorized in Section 45-1-21 shall be added:

Click to view

Driver services fees to which the card stock fee authorized in Section 45-1-21 is not added:

Click to view

In addition to the fees required in this section, an applicant may contribute an additional One Dollar ($1.00) which shall be deposited into the Statewide Litter Prevention Fund. The applicant shall be informed that he may contribute an additional One Dollar ($1.00) which shall be deposited into the Statewide Litter Prevention Fund and shall be expended solely for the purpose of funding litter prevention projects or litter education programs, as recommended by the Statewide Litter Prevention Program of Keep Mississippi Beautiful, Inc.

All originals and renewals of operators’ licenses shall be in compliance with Section 63-1-47.

Class R original or renewal four-year license authorized in Section 63-1-5 $18.00 Class R original or renewal eight-year license authorized in Section 63-1-5 $36.00 Class D original or renewal four-year license authorized in Section 63-1-47 $23.00 Class D original or renewal eight-year license authorized in Section 63-1-47 $46.00 Four-year Identification Card authorized in Section 45-35-7 $11.00 Eight-year Identification Card authorized in Section 45-35-7 $22.00 Eight-year Identification Card for the blind authorized in Section 45-35-7 $11.00 Four-year Disability Identification Card authorized in Section 45-35-53 $11.00 Regular Learner’s Permit authorized in Section 63-1-21 $ 1.00 Duplicate Identification Card or Disability Identification Card $ 5.00 Intermediate license authorized in Section 63-1-21 $ 5.00 Duplicate Class R or Class D license authorized in Section 63-1-37 $ 5.00 Class A, B or C Commercial driver’s license authorized in Section 63-1-208 $48.00 CDL Learner’s Permit authorized in Section 63-1-208 $10.00 Duplicate CDL or CDL learner’s permit $ 5.00 Ignition-Interlock-Restricted License authorized in Section 63-11-31 $50.00

Temporary Motorcycle Permit $ 1.00 Four-year or eight-year Motorcycle Endorsement $ 5.00 Late Renewal Fee $ 1.00 Four-year Identification Card upon medical reason for surrender of a driver’s license as authorized in (one (1) time only) Section 45-35-7 No fee Hazardous Materials Background Check (federal) $63.00 Hazardous Materials Background Check (state) $37.00 CDL Application Fee $25.00 CDL Endorsements: Tanker Endorsement $ 5.00 Doubles/Triples Endorsement $ 5.00 Passenger Endorsement $ 5.00 Hazardous Materials Endorsement $ 5.00 School Bus Endorsement $ 5.00

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8102; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, chs. 157, 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 7; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 5; Laws, 1950, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 493; Laws, 1962, ch. 523; Laws, 1968, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 453, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 23; Laws, 1992, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 535, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 30; Laws, 2010, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 12, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-45.
Maintenance of records relating to application forms and fees; audit of forms and funds; receipt for fees; effect of dishonor of check; disposition of fees.

License examiners shall keep a complete record of all funds received from applicants upon forms to be prescribed and furnished by the department out of the operating funds of the department. Application forms shall be printed in book form and serially numbered and in such form that the original thereof may be transmitted by the license examiner to the commissioner, together with the renewal fee. A copy signed by the examiner shall be given to the applicant, and a copy shall be retained by the examiner. The license examiner shall, not later than ten (10) days from the date of an application, transmit the application, together with the fee, to the commissioner. The application blanks and funds shall be subject to audit at any time. The commissioner shall maintain records of all application forms on hand and issued to the examiners, who shall be charged therewith. The receipt provided for in this section shall be the only valid and recognized form of receipt for fees paid by applicants, and the receipt shall be sufficient in lieu of the renewed license for a period of sixty (60) days or until the renewed license has been issued to the applicant by the commissioner.

There shall be tendered with all applications for a temporary driving permit, temporary motorcycle driving permit, initial issuance of any license issued pursuant to this article, renewal licenses, duplicate licenses or any other services for which a fee is charged, the proper fee required by law by cash, certified check, money order or electronic payment as authorized under Section 27-104-33.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall deposit the amount of fees, together with all fees for duplicate licenses, permits, delinquent fees and reinstatement fees collected by him into the General Fund of the State Treasury, in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-1-23(2); however, Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the fee derived from the fee charged for original and renewal operators’ licenses imposed under Section 63-1-43(1) and Four Dollars ($4.00) of the fee derived from the fee charged for original and renewal Class D commercial drivers’ licenses under Section 63-1-43(4) shall be deposited into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury. Monies in the fund may be expended upon legislative appropriation solely for the purchase by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol of patrol cars, communications equipment and weapons.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8102, 8114; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, chs. 157, 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, §§ 7, 8; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1950, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, §§ 3, 5; Laws, 1958, chs. 493, 509; Laws, 1962, ch. 523; Laws, 1968, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 396, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 17; Laws, 1992, ch. 469, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 467, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-1-46.
Fees for reinstatement of license subsequent to suspension, revocation or cancellation generally; disposition of fees; procedure and fees for reinstatement of license suspended for noncompliance with support order.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall be charged for the reinstatement of a license issued under this article to every person whose license has been validly suspended, revoked or cancelled.

The funds received under the provisions of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be deposited into the State General Fund in accordance with Section 45-1-23;

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be paid to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for funding the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System as provided under Section 25-13-7;

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be deposited into the special fund created in Section 63-1-45(3) for purchases of equipment by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; and

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be deposited into the Interlock Device Fund created in Section 63-11-33.

A fee of One Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($175.00) shall be charged for the reinstatement of a license issued under this article to every person whose license has been validly suspended or revoked under the provisions of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law.

The funds received under the provisions of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall be deposited into the State General Fund in accordance with Section 45-1-23;

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be paid to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for funding the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System as provided under Section 25-13-7;

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be deposited into the special fund created in Section 63-1-45(3) for purchases of equipment by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; and

Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be deposited into the Interlock Device Fund created in Section 63-11-33.

A fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall be charged for the reinstatement of a license issued under this article to every person whose license has been validly suspended for nonpayment of child support under the provisions of Sections 93-11-151 through 93-11-163. The funds received under the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited into the State General Fund in accordance with Section 45-1-23.

The procedure for the reinstatement of a license issued under this article that has been suspended for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153, and the payment of any fees for the reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.

A fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) will be charged for the reinstatement of a license that was suspended due to payment by a draft or other instrument that is dishonored by the payor.

All reinstatement fees charged under this section shall be in addition to the fees prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 335; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 18; Laws, 1989, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 11; Laws, 2013, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 13; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-1-47.
Duration and expiration of licenses; release of applicant’s school attendance records to department of public safety; suspension of license of certain students who drop out of school.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, each applicant for an original or renewal Class R or Class D license issued pursuant to this article, who is entitled to issuance of same, shall be issued a four-year license or an eight-year license, at the option of the applicant, which will expire at midnight on the licensee’s birthday and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration of the license upon application and payment of the required fee, unless required to be reexamined.

The term of an intermediate license issued under this article shall be one (1) year.

The term of an iginition-interlock-restricted license issued under this article shall be four (4) years.

Any commercial driver’s license issued under Article 5 of this chapter shall be issued for a five-year term to expire at midnight on the licensee’s birthday.

All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age must be accompanied by documentation that the applicant is in compliance with the education requirements of Section 63-1-9(1)(g), and the documentation used in establishing compliance must be dated no more than thirty (30) days before the date of application.

All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age, if applicable, must be accompanied by documentation signed and notarized by the parent or guardian of the applicant and the appropriate school official, authorizing the release of the applicant’s attendance records to the Department of Public Safety as required under Section 63-1-10.

The commissioner shall suspend the driver’s license, intermediate license or regular learner’s permit of a student under eighteen (18) years of age who has been reported by the Department of Education as required by Section 63-1-10.1, and shall give notice of the suspension to the licensee as provided in Section 63-1-52(4). A school superintendent or designee may request that the driver’s license, intermediate license or regular learner’s permit that has been suspended under the provisions of this subsection be reinstated after the student has successfully completed nine (9) weeks of school attendance without an unlawful absence.

Any original or renewal license issued under this chapter to a person who is not a United States citizen shall expire four (4) years from the date of issuance or on the expiration date of the applicant’s authorized stay in the United States, whichever is the lesser period of time, and may be renewed, if the person is otherwise qualified to renew the license, within thirty (30) days of expiration. The fee for any such license and for renewal shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

Any applicant for an original or renewal license under this subsection (4) must present valid documentary evidence documenting that the applicant:

Is a citizen or national of the United States;

Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States;

Has conditional permanent residence status in the United States;

Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status;

Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into or lawful presence in the United States;

Has a pending application for asylum in the United States;

Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States;

Has approved deferred-action status;

Has a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States; or

Has a valid employment authorization card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8114; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 8; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 6; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 5; Laws, 1958, ch. 509; Laws, 1968, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 453, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 19; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 24; Laws, 1990, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 624, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 488, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 31; Laws, 2010, ch. 423, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 5; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 14, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-49.
Renewal of licenses.

An expired license issued pursuant to this article may be renewed at any time within eighteen (18) months after the expiration date of the license upon application and payment of the required fee, and the payment of a delinquent fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43, in lieu of a driver examination, unless the holder of the expired license is required to be examined, or unless the department has reason to believe the licensee is no longer qualified to receive a license.

Any person in the Armed Services of the United States, who holds a valid license issued pursuant to this chapter and is out of state due to military service at the time the license expires, may renew the license by mail or by online renewal services while out of state due to military service or at any time within ninety (90) days after being discharged from military service or upon returning to the state without payment of any delinquent fee or examination, unless the department has reason to believe that the licensee is no longer qualified to receive a license. The person shall make proof by affidavit of the fact of the person’s current military service or of the time of discharge or return. The expiration of the license of a military person under the provisions of this paragraph (a) shall not affect the validity of the license, but the license shall continue to be valid and permit the person to operate a motor vehicle in this state for a period of ninety (90) days after discharge from military service or return to the state or until renewal of the license, whichever occurs first.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) also apply to a dependent of a person in the armed services of the United States who is out of state due to military service if the dependent resides out of state with the armed services member and the license of the dependent expires during the family member’s absence from the state. The Commissioner of Public Safety may adopt such rules and regulations under the Administrative Procedures Act as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this paragraph.

Any person holding a valid license issued pursuant to this article who is going overseas for two (2) to four (4) years and whose license will expire during the stay overseas may renew the license for four (4) years or eight (8) years before leaving. The person shall make proof by affidavit of the fact of the overseas travel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8102, 8114; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, chs. 157, 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, §§ 7, 8; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1950, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, §§ 3, 5; Laws, 1958, chs. 493, 509; Laws, 1962, ch. 523; Laws, 1968, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 20; Laws, 1991, ch. 328 § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 15, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-51.
Grounds and procedure for revocation of licenses; suspension of license for noncompliance with order for support.

It shall be the duty of the court clerk, upon conviction of any person holding a license issued pursuant to this article where the penalty for a traffic violation is as much as Ten Dollars ($10.00), to mail a copy of abstract of the court record or provide an electronically or computer generated copy of abstract of the court record immediately to the commissioner at Jackson, Mississippi, showing the date of conviction, penalty, etc., so that a record of same may be made by the Department of Public Safety. The commissioner shall forthwith revoke the license of any person for a period of one (1) year upon receiving a duly certified record of each person’s convictions of any of the following offenses when such conviction has become final:

Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;

Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this state in event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another;

Perjury or the willful making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under this article or under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles; or

Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon three (3) charges of reckless driving committed within a period of twelve (12) months.

The commissioner shall revoke the license issued pursuant to this article of any person convicted of negligent homicide, in addition to any penalty now provided by law.

In addition to the reasons specified in this section, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the license issued to any person pursuant to this article for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8106, 8173; Laws, 1938, chs. 143, 200; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1956, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 26; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 21; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 50; Laws, 1995, ch. 506, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 12; Laws, 2009, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009); Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-1-52.
Notice by Commissioner of Public Safety to person concerning suspension, cancellation or revocation of person’s driver’s license or driving privileges.

Whenever the Commissioner of Public Safety suspends, cancels or revokes the driver’s license or driving privileges of any person, notice of the suspension, cancellation or revocation shall be given to such person by the commissioner, or his duly authorized agent, in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section and at the time provided in subsection (3) of this section or in the manner and at the time provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Notice shall be given in the following manner:

In writing, (i) by United States Certificate of Mailing; or (ii) by personal service at the person’s address as it appears on the driving record maintained by the Department of Public Safety or at the person’s last-known address; or (iii) by personal notice being given by any law enforcement officer of this state or any duly authorized agent of the Commissioner of Public Safety on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner of Public Safety; whenever a person’s driver’s license or driving privileges are suspended, revoked or cancelled in accordance with the Mississippi Driver License Compact Law, the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Law or subsection (2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(e) or (2)(f) of Section 63-1-53.

In writing, by United States first class mail, whenever a person’s driver’s license or driving privileges are suspended, revoked or cancelled in accordance with the Mississippi Commercial Driver’s License Law, the Youth Court Law, Chapter 23 of Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 63-1-45, Section 63-1-51, subsection (2)(g) or (2)(h) of Section 63-1-53, or Section 63-9-25.

Notice shall be given at the following time:

Before suspension, revocation or cancellation, whenever a person’s driver’s license or driving privileges are suspended, revoked or cancelled in accordance with the Mississippi Driver License Compact Law, the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Law or subsection (2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(e) or (2)(f) of Section 63-1-53.

Unless otherwise specifically provided for by law, at the time of suspension, revocation or cancellation, whenever a person’s driver’s license or driving privileges are suspended, revoked or cancelled in accordance with the Mississippi Commercial Driver’s License Law, the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, the Youth Court Law, Chapter 23 of Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 63-1-45, Section 63-1-51, subsection (2)(g) or (2)(h) of Section 63-1-53, or Section 63-9-25.

Whenever the Commissioner of Public Safety suspends, revokes or cancels the driver’s license or driving privileges of any person in accordance with some provision of law other than a provision of law referred to in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and the manner and time for giving notice is not provided for in such law, then notice of such suspension, revocation or cancellation shall be given in the manner and at the time provided for under subsections (2)(b) and (3)(b) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-1-53.
Notice to accused upon failure to pay fine; notice to Commissioner of Public Safety; authority of commissioner to suspend license without preliminary hearing; notice of suspension; hearing.

Upon failure of any person to pay timely any fine, fee or assessment levied as a result of any violation of this title, the clerk of the court shall give written notice to such person by United States first-class mail at his last known address advising such person that, if within ninety (90) days after such notice is deposited in the mail, the person has not paid the entire amount of all fines, fees and assessments levied, then the court will pursue collection as for any other delinquent payment, and shall be entitled to collection of all additional fees in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to suspend the license of an operator without preliminary hearing upon a showing by his records or other sufficient evidence that the licensee:

Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation of license is required upon conviction except under the provisions of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law;

Has been involved as a driver in any accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another or serious property damage;

Is an habitually reckless or negligent driver of a motor vehicle;

Has been convicted with such frequency of serious offenses against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles as to indicate a disrespect for traffic laws and a disregard for the safety of other persons on the highways;

Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle;

Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of such license;

Has committed an offense in another state which if committed in this state would be grounds for suspension or revocation; or

Has committed a violation for which mandatory revocation of license is required upon conviction, entering a plea of nolo contendere to, or adjudication of delinquency, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of Section 63-1-71.

Notice that a person’s license is suspended or will be suspended under subsection (2) of this section shall be given by the commissioner in the manner and at the time provided for under Section 63-1-52, and upon such person’s request, he shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing as early as practicable, but not to exceed twenty (20) days after receipt of such request in the county wherein the licensee resides unless the department and the licensee agree that such hearing may be held in some other county. Upon such hearing the commissioner, or his duly authorized agent, may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers and may require a reexamination of the licensee. Upon such hearing the commissioner shall either rescind any order of suspension or, good cause appearing therefor, may extend any suspension of such license or revoke such license.

If a licensee has not paid all cash appearance bonds authorized under Section 99-19-3 or all fines, fees or other assessments levied as a result of a violation of this title within ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the licensee’s failure to pay all fines, fees or other assessments as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the court is authorized to pursue collection under Section 21-17-1(6) or 19-3-41(2) as for any other delinquent payment, and shall be entitled to collection of all additional fees authorized under those sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8107; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1956, ch. 379, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 27; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 51; Laws, 1991, ch. 403, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 615 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 487, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 517, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-1-55.
Suspension of license of minor by trial judge; requirement of completion of defensive driving course; costs and assessments; procedure upon appeal of suspension.

A trial judge, in his discretion, if the person so convicted or who has entered a plea of guilty for any traffic violation, except the offenses enumerated in paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (1) of Section 63-1-51 and violations of the Implied Consent Law and the Uniform Controlled Substances Law, is a minor and dependent upon and subject to the care, custody and control of his parents or guardian, may, in lieu of the penalties otherwise provided by law and the provision of said section, suspend such minor’s driver’s license by taking and keeping same in custody of the court for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days. The judge so ordering such suspension shall enter upon his docket “DEFENDANT’S DRIVER’S LICENSE SUSPENDED FOR_______________DAYS IN LIEU OF CONVICTION” and such action by the trial judge shall not constitute a conviction. The trial judge also may require the minor to successfully complete a defensive driving course approved by the judge as a condition of the suspension. Costs of court and penalty assessment for driver education and training program may be imposed in such actions within the discretion of the court. Should a minor appeal, in the time and manner as by law provided, the decision whereby his license is suspended, the trial judge shall then return said license to the minor and impose the fines and/or penalties that he would have otherwise imposed and same shall constitute a conviction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8106; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1956, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 26; Laws, 1992, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 2, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-1-57.
Driving while license or driving privilege cancelled, suspended or revoked.

Any person whose license issued pursuant to this article or driving privilege as a nonresident has been canceled, suspended or revoked as provided in this title or in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, and who drives any motor vehicle upon the highways of this state while such license or privilege is canceled, suspended or revoked, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) days or more than six (6) months. There may be imposed in addition thereto a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8110; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 22; Laws, 1988, ch. 563, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 63-1-58.
License suspensions and restrictions to run consecutively.

Suspension or restriction of driving privileges for any person convicted of or nonadjudicated for violations of the Implied Consent Law or any administrative suspension imposed under this chapter shall run consecutively and not concurrently.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016.

§ 63-1-59.
Making false affidavit or statements.

Any person who makes any false affidavit, or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter or thing required by the terms of this article to be sworn to or affirmed, is guilty of perjury and upon conviction shall be punishable by fine or imprisonment as other persons committing perjury are punishable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8109; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-60.
Alteration, fraudulent use, or fraudulent procurement of license.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in his possession, any fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained driver’s license;

To display or represent any driver’s license not issued to him as being his own driver’s license;

To photograph, photostat, duplicate or in any way reproduce, manufacture, sell or distribute or alter any driver’s license, or facsimile thereof, in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid driver’s license;

To display or have in his possession any photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction or facsimile of a driver’s license unless authorized by law; or

To take a driver’s license examination for another or to use any other name, other than his own, on the driver’s license application in an attempt to take the driver’s license examination for another.

Any person convicted of a violation of paragraph (a), (b), (d) or (e) of subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of the offense who is convicted of a violation of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall be punished as follows:

A first offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

A second or subsequent offense, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older at the time of the offense who is convicted of a violation of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 479; Laws, 1998, ch. 558, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 551, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-1-61.
Causing or permitting child or ward under sixteen years of age to drive without authorization.

No person shall cause or knowingly permit his child or ward under the age of sixteen (16) years to drive a motor vehicle upon any highway if such minor is not authorized under the provisions of this article or is in violation of any of the provisions of this article. Any penalty imposed under the provisions of this section shall be in addition to any penalty imposed against the minor for a violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8111; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 4, eff from and after September 1, 1995.

§ 63-1-63.
Permitting operation of vehicle by another person in violation of article.

No person shall authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by him or under his control to be driven upon any highway by any person who is not authorized under the provisions of this article or in violation of any of the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8112; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-65.
Loan of license or temporary permit to another or use of another’s permit or license.

It shall be unlawful for any person to lend or borrow any temporary driving permit or license issued pursuant to this article, or to display or represent a license or temporary permit not issued to himself. Any person violating this section shall be fined not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) and costs and not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) and costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8116; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1985.